New York, session 2025-2026, S5277.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 70 of the cannabis law is amended 2 to read as follows: 3 3. A cooperative member [shall be a natural person and] shall not be a 4 member of more than one adult-use cooperative licensed pursuant to this 5 section. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08261-01-5